sv: Driftstyp för degextruder: Vev/roterande press; Handpress (spruta/pistol); Spakpress; Kolvpress; Vals; Övrigt
de: Betriebsart des Teigextruders: Kurbel-/Rotationspresse; Handpresse (Spritze/Pistole); Hebelpresse; Kolbenpresse; Walzenpresse; Sonstige
tr: Hamur şekillendirme aparatı çalışma tipi: Krank/döner pres; El presi (şırınga/tabanca); Kollu pres; Pistonlu pres; Silindir pres; Diğer
lt-LT: Tešlos ekstruderio veikimo tipas: Sukamasis presas; Rankinis presas (švirkštas / pistoletas); Svirtinis presas; Stūmoklinis presas; Valcavimo presas; Kita
pl: Typ działania wyciskarki do masy: Prasa korbowa/obrotowa; Prasa ręczna (strzykawka/pistolet); Prasa dźwigniowa; Prasa tłokowa; Prasa walcowa; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta rada ekstrudera za tijesto: Preša na ručicu / rotacijska preša; Ručna preša (šprica/pištolj); Preša na polugu; Preša s klipom; Preša s valjcima; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de operação da extrusora de massa: Prensa de manivela/rotativa; Prensa manual (seringa/pistola); Prensa de alavanca; Prensa de êmbolo; Prensa de rolo; Outros
cs: Typ provozu extrudéru těsta: Klikový/rotační lis; Ruční lis (stříkačka/pistole); Pákový lis; Pístový lis; Válcový lis; Jiné
ja: 生地押出機の操作タイプ: クランク/ロータリープレス; ハンドプレス (注射器/ガン型); レバープレス; プランジャープレス; ローリングプレス; その他
el: Τύπος λειτουργίας συσκευής εξώθησης ζύμης: Πρέσα με μανιβέλα/περιστροφική; Πρέσα χειρός (σύριγγα/πιστόλι); Πρέσα με μοχλό; Πρέσα με έμβολο; Πρέσα με κύλινδρο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ prevádzky zariadenia na vytláčanie cesta: Kľukový/rotačný lis; Ručný lis (striekačka/pištoľ); Pákový lis; Piestový lis; Valcový lis; Iný
pt-PT: Tipo de operação da extrusora de massa: Prensa de manivela/rotativa; Prensa manual (seringa/pistola); Prensa de alavanca; Prensa de êmbolo; Prensa de rolo; Outro
th: ประเภทการทำงานของเครื่องอัดแป้ง: ที่บีบแบบหมุน; แบบกดด้วยมือ (กระบอกฉีด/ปืน); ที่บีบแบบคันโยก; ที่บีบแบบก้านสูบ; ที่บีบแบบลูกกลิ้ง; อื่นๆ
fi: Taikinapuristimen käyttötapa: Kampi-/pyörivä puristin; Käsipuristin (ruisku/pistooli); Vipupuristin; Mäntäpuristin; Rullapuristin; Muu
fr: Type de fonctionnement de l’extrudeuse de pâte: Presse à manivelle/rotative; Presse manuelle (seringue/pistolet); Presse à levier; Presse à piston; Presse à rouleau; Autre
da: Dejudtrækkerens betjeningstype: Håndsving/rotationspresse; Håndpresse (sprøjte/pistol); Vægtstangspresse; Stempelpresse; Rullepresse; Andet
ko: 반죽 압출기 작동 방식: 크랭크/로터리 프레스; 핸드 프레스(주사기/건); 레버 프레스; 플런저 프레스; 롤링 프레스; 기타
en: Dough extruder operation type: Crank/rotary press; Hand-press (syringe/gun); Lever press; Plunger press; Rolling press; Other
zh-CN: 面团挤出机操作类型: 曲柄/旋转压机; 手压式（注射器/枪形）; 杠杆压机; 柱塞压机; 滚压机; 其他
ru: Тип работы экструдера для теста: Кривошипный/роторный пресс; Ручной пресс (шприц/пистолет); Рычажный пресс; Плунжерный пресс; Роликовый пресс; Другое
vi: Loại hoạt động của máy ép bột: Máy ép dạng quay/tay quay; Ép bằng tay (kiểu ống tiêm/súng); Ép bằng đòn bẩy; Ép bằng pít tông; Ép dạng lăn; Khác
ro-RO: Modul de funcționare al extruderului de aluat: Presă cu manivelă/rotativă; Presă manuală (seringă/pistol); Presă cu pârghie; Presă cu piston; Presă cu rulare; Altele
it: Tipo di funzionamento dell'estrusore per impasti: Pressa a manovella/rotante; Pressa a mano (siringa/pistola); Pressa a leva; Pressa a stantuffo; Pressa a rullo; Altro
zh-TW: 麵團擠出器操作類型: 曲柄/旋轉壓製; 手動壓製 (注射器/擠壓槍); 槓桿壓製; 柱塞壓製; 滾輪壓製; 其他
es: Tipo de funcionamiento de la extrusora de masa: Prensa de manivela/giratoria; Prensa manual (jeringa/pistola); Prensa de palanca; Prensa de émbolo; Prensa de rodillo; Otro
hu: Tészta extruder működési típusa: Hajtókaros/forgóprés; Kézi prés (fecskendő/kinyomópisztoly); Karos prés; Dugattyús prés; Hengeres prés; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta delovanja ekstruderja testa: Preša na ročico/rotacijska; Ročna preša (brizga/pištola); Vzvodna preša; Batna preša; Valjčna preša; Drugo
nl: Deegextruder werkingstype: Slinger-/rotatiepers; Handpers (spuit/pistool); Hefboompers; Zuigerpers; Rolpers; Overige
bg-BG: Тип работа на екструдера за тесто: Манивела/ротационна преса; Ръчна преса (спринцовка/пистолет); Преса с лост; Преса с бутало; Валцова преса; Друго
nb: Deigekstruderens operasjonstype: Sveiv/roterende presse; Håndpresse (sprøyte/pistol); Spakpresse; Stempelpresse; Rullepresse; Annet